Louisiana, session 2026, SB363.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1128.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1128.1. Coverage for skilled care
A. A health insurance issuer shall not substitute a lower level of care for
otherwise covered medically necessary treatment when the substitute is
contrary to the determination of the treating provider and is based primarily
on cost-containment or utilization management criteria that conflict with
generally accepted standards of care.
B. For the purposes of this Section, "lower level of care" means any
healthcare service or setting that provides less intensive treatment, monitoring,
supervision, or therapeutic intervention than that recommended by the treating
provider.
C. This Section shall not apply if the substitute level of care is consistent
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-593 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 363
with generally accepted standards of medical practice and is clinically
appropriate for the patient's condition.